Utah statutes.
41-6a-1620.   Departmental approval of lighting devices or safety equipment.
(1) (a) The department shall approve or disapprove any lighting device or
other safety equipment, component or assembly of a type for which approval is
specifically required under this part.
(b)  The department shall consider the part for approval within a reasonable
time after approval has been requested.
(2) (a)  The department shall establish a procedure for the submission,
review, approval, disapproval, issuance of an approval certificate, and the
expiration or renewal of approval for any part under Subsection (1).
(b) (i)  The procedure may provide for submission of the part to the American
Association of Motor Vehicle Administrators as the agent of the department.
(ii)  Approval issued by the association under Subsection (1)(b)(i) shall have
the same force and effect as if it has been issued by the department.
(c)  The department shall maintain and publish lists of all parts, devices,
components, or assemblies which have been approved by the department.
(d) A part approved under this section is valid unless revoked under Section
41-6a-1621 or unless the department requires it to be renewed under rules made
under Section 41-6a-1601.
